Wisconsin, session 2025, AB716.
do enact as follows:AB716,11Section 1. 16.75 (3m) (a) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB716,2,3216.75 (3m) (a) 5. “Woman-owned business” means a business certified by the 3department under s. 16.285.AB716,24Section 2. 16.75 (3m) (c) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB716,2,23516.75 (3m) (c) 4. The department shall annually prepare and submit a report 6to the governor and to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature, for 7distribution to the appropriate standing committees under s. 13.172 (3), on the total 8amount of money paid to and the amount of indebtedness or other obligations 9underwritten by minority businesses, minority financial advisers, minority 10investment firms, woman-owned businesses, disabled veteran-owned businesses, 11disabled veteran-owned financial advisers, and disabled veteran-owned investment 12firms under the requirements of this subsection and ss. 16.855 (10m), 16.87 (2), 1325.185, 84.075 and 565.25 (2) (a) 3. and on this state’s progress toward achieving 14compliance with par. (b) and ss. 16.855 (10m) (am) and (10n), 16.87 (2), 25.185, and 1584.075 (1m). The report shall also include the percentage of the total amount of 16money paid to and the percentage of the total amount of indebtedness or other 17obligations underwritten by woman-owned businesses, disabled veteran-owned 18businesses, disabled veteran-owned financial advisers, and disabled veteran-owned 19investment firms. In calculating the percentages to be reported under this 20subsection, the department shall exclude any purchase or contract for which a 21preference would violate any federal law or regulation or any contract between an 22agency and a federal agency or any contract that would result in a reduction in the 23amount of federal aids received by this state.AB716,324Section 3. 16.75 (3m) (c) 5. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB716,3,6116.75 (3m) (c) 5. a. In determining whether a purchase, contract, or 2subcontract complies with the goal established under par. (b) 1. or 2. or s. 16.855 3(10m) (am) 1. or 2., 16.87 (2) (b), (bm), or (c), or 25.185 (2) (a) or (b), the department 4shall include only amounts paid to businesses, financial advisers, and investment 5firms certified by the department of administration under s. 16.283, 16.285, or 616.287 (2), whichever is appropriate.AB716,47Section 4. 16.87 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB716,3,10816.87 (2) (bm) The department shall attempt to ensure that 5 percent of the 9total amount expended under this section in each fiscal year is paid to woman-10owned businesses, as defined in s. 16.75 (3m) (a) 5.AB716,3,1111